Washington statutes.
RCW 11.04.230

United States savings bond—Effect of death of co-owner.

If either co-owner of United States savings bonds registered in two names as co-owners (in the alternative) dies without having presented and surrendered the bond for payment to a federal reserve bank or the treasury department, the surviving co-owner will be the sole and absolute owner of the bond.

[ 1965 c 145 s 11.04.230. Prior: 1943 c 14 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 11548-60.]